Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-102]
Definitions. As used in this article:

"Commissioner"
means the insurance commissioner.

"Enrollee"
means a person who enters into a contractual relationship or who is provided
with health care services or benefits through a managed care plan.

"Managed
care plan" or "plan" means a health plan as defined in section
431:10A, or chapter 432 or 432D, regardless of form, offered or administered by
a health care insurer, including but not limited to a mutual benefit society or
health maintenance organization, or voluntary employee beneficiary
associations, but shall not include disability insurers licensed under chapter
431.

"Rate" means every rate, charge, classification, schedule, practice, or rule.
The definition of "rate" excludes fees and fee schedules paid by the
insurer to providers of services covered under this article.

"Supplementary
rating information" includes
any manual or plan of rates, classification, rating schedule, minimum premium,
policy fee, rating rule, underwriting rule, statistical plan, and any other
similar information needed to determine the applicable rates in effect or to be
in effect.

"Supporting
information" means:

(1) The
experience and judgment of the filer and the experience or data of other
organizations relied on by the filer;

(2) The
interpretation of any other data relied upon by the filer; and

(3) Descriptions
of methods used in making the rates and any other information required by the
commissioner to be filed. [L 2007, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next